Utah statutes.
23-14-13.   Wildlife Resources Account.
(1)  The Wildlife Resources Account is established within the General Fund.
(2)  The following monies shall be deposited into the Wildlife Resources
Account:
(a)  revenue from the sale of licenses, permits, tags, and certificates of
registration issued under this title or a rule or proclamation of the Wildlife
Board, except as otherwise provided by this title;
(b)  revenue from the sale, lease, rental, or other granting of rights of real
or personal property acquired with revenue specified in Subsection (2)(a);
(c)  revenue from fines and forfeitures for violations of this title or any
rule, proclamation, or order of the Wildlife Board, minus court costs not to
exceed the schedule adopted by the Judicial Council;
(d)  funds appropriated from the General Fund by the Legislature pursuant to
Section 23-19-39;
(e)  other monies received by the division under any provision of this title,
except as otherwise provided by this title;
(f)  contributions made in accordance with Section 59-10-1305; and
(g)  interest, dividends, or other income earned on account monies.
(3)  Monies in the Wildlife Resources Account shall be used for the
administration of this title.
